Utah statutes.
10-8-37.   Construction, repair, and maintenance of bridges, viaducts, and tunnels -- Retainage.

(1)  They may construct and keep in repair bridges, viaducts and tunnels, and regulate the use thereof.

(2)  If any payment on a contract with a private person, firm, or corporation to construct bridges, viaducts, or tunnels is retained or withheld, it shall be retained or withheld and released as provided in Section 13-8-5.

